Washington statutes.
RCW 33.28.010

Filing and copy fees.

The secretary of state shall collect fees of twenty dollars in advance for filing articles of incorporation. The secretary of state shall establish by rule, fees for amendments to articles of incorporation, other certificates required to be filed in his or her office, and for furnishing copies of papers filed in his or her office.

Every association shall also pay to the secretary of state, for filing any instrument with him or her, the same fees as are required of general corporations for filing similar papers.

[ 1993 c 269 s 13; 1981 c 302 s 33; 1945 c 235 s 76; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-195.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 269: See note following RCW 23.86.070.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.

Corporations, fees in general: Chapter 23B.01 RCW.